New York, session 2025-2026, A10284.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 1001 of the labor law, as added by 2 chapter 562 of the laws of 2022, is amended to read as follows: 3 1. For faculty or teacher employees, a public service employer certi- 4 fying employment after the effective date of the chapter of the laws of 5 two thousand twenty-six that amended this subdivision shall credit 6 [3.35] five hours worked for each hour of lecture or classroom time, 7 regardless of when the hours were worked, including hours worked prior 8 to the effective date of the chapter of the laws of two thousand twen- 9 ty-six that amended this subdivision. This subdivision does not super- 10 sede any greater adjustment factor established by a collective bargain- 11 ing agreement or employer policy in recognition of additional work 12 associated with lecture or classroom time for the purpose of the public 13 service loan forgiveness program. 14 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14841-01-6